Maryland, session 2025, SB0487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3.5–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) (1) “Development” means all expenditures for a new information
technology system or an enhancement to an existing system including system:
(i) planning;
(ii) creation;
(iii) installation;
(iv) testing; and
(v) initial training.
(2) “Development” does not include:
(i) ongoing operating costs, software or hardware maintenance,
routine upgrades, or modifications that merely allow for a continuation of the existing level
of functionality; or
(ii) expenditures made after a new or enhanced system has been
legally accepted by the user and is being used for the business process for which it was
intended.
(h) “Information technology” means all electronic information processing,
including:
(1) maintenance;
(2) networking;
(3) telecommunications;
(4) hardware;
(5) software and applications; and

SENATE BILL 487 3
(6) associated services.
(k) (1) “Major information technology development project” means any
information technology development project that meets one or more of the following
criteria:
(i) except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the
estimated total cost of development equals or exceeds $5,000,000;
(ii) the project is undertaken to support a critical business function
associated with the public health, education, safety, or financial well–being of the residents
of Maryland; or
(iii) the Secretary determines that the project requires the special
attention and consideration given to a major information technology development project
due to:
1. the significance of the project’s potential benefits or risks;
2. the impact of the project on the public or local
governments;
3. the public visibility of the project; or
4. other reasons as determined by the Secretary.
(2) “Major information technology development project” does not include:
(i) technology that is reoccurring, standard operating technology as
determined by the Secretary and submitted to the Legislative Policy Committee for a
30–day review and comment period; or
(ii) a project with an estimated total cost of development that is:
1. less than $5,000,000 and is funded with money set aside
for expedited projects in the Fund; or
2. more than $5,000,000 and is funded with the money set
aside for expedited projects in the Fund if the Secretary determines that:
A. the unit of State government has sufficient
implementation resources, including human capital, subject matter expertise, and
technological infrastructure, or has the means to obtain these resources before project
initiation;
B. there is no sufficient alternative within the State’s
information technology inventory; and

SENATE BILL 487
C. the project will result in a comprehensive solution
designed to meet a cohesive set of business and technological objectives.
3.5–308.
(a) This section does not apply to a public institution of higher education.
(b) Before submitting its information technology project requests, a unit of State
government shall submit information in support of the request required by the Secretary
for review and determination consistent with § 3.5–301(k) of this subtitle.
(c) In reviewing information technology project requests, the Secretary may
change a unit’s designation of a major information technology development project.
(d) (1) The Secretary shall review and, with the advice of the Secretary of
Budget and Management, approve major information technology development projects and
specifications for consistency with all statewide plans, policies, and standards, including a
systems development life cycle plan.
(2) (I) IF, AFTER A REVIEW UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY BELIEVES A MAJOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
DEVELOPMENT PROJECT MAY PRESENT AN EXCEPTIONAL RISK TO THE STATE, THE
SECRETARY SHALL CONDUCT A RISK ASSESSMENT PRIOR TO APPROVING THE
MAJOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT PROJECT.
(II) A RISK ASSESSMENT CONDUCTED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH
(I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL CONSIDER THE NATURE, PROCESSING, AND USE OF
SENSITIVE OR PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION.
(III) IF THE RISK ASSESSMENT CONCLUDES THAT THE MAJOR
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT PROJECT PRESENTS AN EXCEPTIONAL
RISK TO THE STATE AND THE LIMITATION OF LIABILITY AMOUNT PROVIDED UNDER
§ 13–228 OF THIS ARTICLE IS NOT ADEQUATE TO PROTECT THE INTEREST OF THE
STATE, THE SECRETARY MAY RECOMMEND THE UNIT INCREASE THE LIMITATION OF
LIABILITY AMOUNT.
(IV) A RECOMMENDATION MADE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (III)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL:
1. BE IN WRITING;
2. DESCRIBE THE RISKS TO THE STATE;
3. EXPLAIN THE REASONS THAT THE LIMITATIONS

SENATE BILL 487 5
REQUIRED UNDER § 13–228 OF THIS ARTICLE ARE NOT ADEQUATE TO MITIGATE THE
RISKS DESCRIBED; AND
4. RECOMMEND A REASONABLE MAXIMUM
ALTERNATIVE LIMITATION OF LIABILITY AMOUNT, CALCULATED AS A MULTIPLE OF
THE CONTRACT VALUE.
(3) THE CHIEF PROCUREMENT OFFICER:
(I) SHALL REVIEW A RECOMMENDATION MADE UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) MAY APPROVE A CHANGE TO THE LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
REQUIRED UNDER § 13–228 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(e) The Secretary shall be responsible for overseeing the implementation of major
information technology development projects, regardless of fund source.
(f) (1) With the advice of the Secretary of Budget and Management,
expenditures for major information technology development projects shall be subject to the
approval of the Secretary who shall approve expenditures only when those projects are
consistent with statewide plans, policies, and standards.
(2) The Secretary shall make a recommendation to the Secretary of Budget
and Management that project funds, regardless of fund source, be withheld if:
(i) a unit of State government is not consistently reporting on the
status of a project or projects to the Department in the form and manner required by the
Department; or
(ii) the Department determines that project implementation issues
exist, including project timeline delays, significant cost increases, vendor nonperformance,
decreased agency capacity, or other issues that indicate issues of concern that could
jeopardize successful implementation.
(g) (1) The Secretary shall approve funding for major information technology
development projects, expedited projects, and other expenditures from the Fund only when:
(i) the major information technology development projects or the
expedited projects are in compliance with statewide plans, policies, and standards, as
determined by the Secretary; and
(ii) the major information technology development projects are
supported by an approved systems development life cycle plan.

SENATE BILL 487
(2) An approved systems development life cycle plan shall include
submission of:
(i) a project planning request that details initial planning for the
project, including:
1. the project title, appropriation code, and summary;
2. a description of:
A. the business and technology outcomes to be achieved by
the project;
B. the features available to the end user on completion,
including user acceptance testing and accessibility plans;
C. the potential risks associated with the project;
D. possible alternatives; and
E. the scope and complexity of the project; and
3. an estimate of:
A. the total costs required to complete through planning; and
B. the fund sources available to support planning costs; and
(ii) a project implementation request to begin full design,
development, and implementation of the project after the completion of planning, including:
1. the project title, appropriation code, and summary;
2. a description of:
A. the business and technology outcomes to be achieved by
the project and the metrics by which the success of those outcomes will be measured;
B. the features available to the end user on completion,
including user acceptance testing and accessibility plans;
C. the potential risks associated with the project;
D. possible alternatives;
E. the scope and complexity of the project; and

SENATE BILL 487 7
F. how the project meets the goals of the statewide master
plan; and
3. an estimate of:
A. the total project cost, by phase; and
B. the fund sources to be utilized.
(3) The Secretary may approve funding incrementally, consistent with the
systems development life cycle plan.
(h) The Department, in consultation with the Modernize Maryland Commission
established under § 3.5–316 of this subtitle, shall:
(1) develop standards for units of State government to assist in identifying
legacy systems that require modernization projects appropriate to be financed as an
expedited project through the Fund;
(2) adopt an Information Technology Investment Maturity Model that
includes:
(i) criteria to inform and prioritize investment decisions;
(ii) processes to develop the information required to evaluate
investment proposals against the criteria under item (i) of this item; and
(iii) management processes to monitor the implementation of
approved modernization projects; and
(3) develop a State Modernization Plan.
(I) IN THE ANNUAL REPORT SUBMITTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
3.5–309(N) OF THIS SUBTITLE, BEGINNING WITH THE ANNUAL REPORT SUBMITTED
IN 2026, THE SECRETARY SHALL PUBLISH A LIST OF RECOMMENDATIONS MADE
UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(2) OF THIS SECTION AND THE OUTCOME OF THE
RECOMMENDATION REVIEW CONDUCTED UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(3) OF THIS
SECTION DURING THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR.
3.5–309.
(n) (1) On or before November 1 of each year, the Secretary shall report to the
Governor and the Secretary of Budget and Management and, in accordance with § 2–1257
of the State Government Article, to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the Senate
Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment, the House Appropriations

SENATE BILL 487
Committee, the House Health and Government Operations Committee, and the Joint
Committee on Cybersecurity, Information Technology, and Biotechnology.
(2) The report shall include:
(i) the financial status of the Fund and a summary of its operations
for the preceding fiscal year;
(ii) an accounting for the preceding fiscal year of all money from each
of the revenue sources specified in subsection (e) of this section, including any expenditures
made from the Fund; [and]
(iii) for each project receiving money from the Fund in the preceding
fiscal year and for each major information technology development project or expedited
project receiving funding from any source other than the Fund in the preceding fiscal year:
1. the status of the project and project funding decisions;
2. a comparison of estimated and actual costs of the project;
3. any known or anticipated changes in scope or costs of the
project;
4. an evaluation of whether the project is using best
practices; and
5. a summary of any monitoring and oversight of the project
from outside the agency in which the project is being developed, including a description of
any problems identified by any external review and any corrective actions taken; AND
(IV) THE LIST OF RECOMMENDATIONS AND REVIEW OUTCOMES
REQUIRED UNDER § 3.5–308(I) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
13–228.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION AND §
3.5–308(D)(2)(III) OF THIS ARTICLE, EACH PROCUREMENT CONTRACT FOR A MAJOR
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT PROJECT SHALL INCLUDE TERMS AND
CONDITIONS GOVERNING THE INDEMNIFICATION OBLIGATIONS AND LIMITATION OF
LIABILITY OF THE CONTRACTOR THAT ARE REASONABLE AND MAY NOT EXCEED IN
AGGREGATE TWICE THE VALUE OF THE CONTRACT.
(B) A CONTRACT PROVISION ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT LIMIT THE LIABILITY OF A CONTRACTOR FOR:

SENATE BILL 487 9
(1) INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL MISCONDUCT, FRAUD, OR
RECKLESSNESS OF THE CONTRACTOR OR AN EMPLOYEE OF THE CONTRACTOR; OR
(2) CLAIMS FOR BODILY INJURY, INCLUDING DEATH, AND DAMAGE TO
REAL PROPERTY OR TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY RESULTING FROM THE
NEGLIGENCE OF THE CONTRACTOR OR AN EMPLOYEE OF THE CONTRACTOR.
(C) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION PROHIBITS A UNIT FROM AGREEING TO A
LIMITATION OF LIABILITY THAT IS LESS THAN TWICE THE VALUE OF THE CONTRACT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Chief Procurement Officer
in the Department of General Services and the Secretary of Information Technology shall:
(1) together with appropriate stakeholders, examine the procurement
processes for major information technology development projects, including:
(i) the time frames for competitive sealed procurements for major
information technology development projects, from issuing the request for proposal through
evaluation and contract award; and
(ii) how the associated time frames impact the allocation of
personnel within companies bidding on major information technology development
projects;
(2) make recommendations on adjusting the procurement process and
associated timeline for major information technology development projects to ensure
personnel with required expertise are available to work on an awarded contract; and
(3) on or before December 1, 2026, report to the General Assembly, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the examination and
recommendations conducted under this section.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.